North Carolina statutes. Chapter 114. Department of Justice.
Article 1. Attorney General.
§ 114-4.4.
Deputy attorneys general.

The Attorney General is hereby authorized to designate from among his staff such deputy attorneys general as he shall deem advisable to perform such duties and undertake such responsibilities as he may direct.

History.

1963, c. 355; 1973, c. 702, s. 8.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Those members of the Council of State who have statutory authority to delegate duties may, in conformity with such statutes, attend and vote at meetings of Boards of which they are
ex officio
members through delegates or designated subordinates. The remaining members of the Council of State may make similar delegations or designations where, in the member’s judgment, other duties necessitate his absence and the statute creating his

ex officio

membership does not express or clearly imply an intent of the General Assembly that the powers of such membership be exercised personally. See opinion of Attorney General to the honorable James E. Long, Commissioner of Insurance, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 116 (1986).

§ 114-5.
Additional clerical help.

The Attorney General shall be allowed such additional clerical help as shall be necessary; the amount of such help and the salary therefor shall be fixed by the Department of Administration and the Attorney General.

History.

1925, c. 207, s. 2; 1957, c. 269, s. 1.

§ 114-6.
Duties of Attorney General as to civil litigation.

The Attorney General shall continue to perform all duties now required of his office by law and to exercise the duties now prescribed by law as to civil litigation affecting the State, or any agency or department thereof, and shall assign to the members of the staff all duties to be performed in connection with criminal prosecutions and civil litigation authorized by this Article or by existing laws.

History.

1939, c. 315, ss. 7, 8.

§ 114-6.1.
Biannual reporting on attorney activity.

Beginning on February 1, 2013, and every six months thereafter, the Attorney General shall report on the work of Department of Justice attorneys during the previous two quarters. The reports required by this section shall be filed with the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety and with the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly as follows:

Agency-specific work.— A report on the work of Department of Justice attorneys for State agencies. This report shall include at least all of the following information:

The amount of time spent working for each State department and agency.

The amount of time spent on each case for each State department and agency.

The amount billed to each State agency for the legal services provided.

Other work.— A report on the work of Department of Justice attorneys that is not on behalf of a particular State agency. The report required by this subdivision shall include all of the information required by subdivision (1) of this section. The report shall include at least all of the following information:

The amount of time spent by each unit of the Department of Justice.

The amount of time spent on each particular matter for each unit of the Department of Justice.

History.

2012-142, s. 15.2.

Annual Reporting on Attorney Activity.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 17.1(a), (b), provides: “(a) Beginning on August 1, 2014, and every year thereafter, the Attorney General shall report on the work of Department of Justice attorneys during the previous year. The reports required by this section shall be filed with the Chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Justice and Public Safety, with the Chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety, with the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety, and with the Fiscal Research Division as follows:

“(1) Litigation. — A report reflecting the amount of time spent by each attorney on litigation. The report shall include the following information:

“a. The amount of time spent working directly on civil litigation in a trial court, administrative forum, or appellate court for each specific State agency, board, commission, official, or other client.

“b. The amount of time spent working directly on civil litigation in a trial court, administrative forum, or appellate court involving cases in which there is not a specific State agency, board, commission, official, or other client named as a defendant.

“c. The amount of time spent working on criminal cases at the trial or appellate level.

“(2) Other work. — A report reflecting the amount of time spent by each attorney providing legal services that did not directly involve litigation. The report shall include the following information:

“a. The amount of time spent providing legal services not directly involving litigation for each specific State agency, board, commission, or other client.

“b. The amount of time spent providing legal services for local government bodies, officials, and citizens.

“(3) Billing. — A report reflecting the amount billed to each State agency, board, commission, or other client as required by

G.S. 114-8.2

.

“(b) Reports required by this section shall not include detailed information about the work of individual attorneys but shall instead include only summary information about Department of Justice attorney activity during the relevant period, which shall (i) be set forth using commonly employed measures of central tendency and (ii) which shall highlight and explain extreme deviations from applicable norms.”

§ 114-7.
Salary of the Attorney General.

The salary of the Attorney General shall be set by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act. In addition to the salary set by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act, longevity pay shall be paid on the same basis as is provided to employees of the State who are subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act.

History.

1929, c. 1, s. 2; 1947, c. 1043; 1949, c. 1278; 1953, c. 1, s. 2; 1957, c. 1; 1963, c. 1178, s. 3; 1967, c. 1130; c. 1237, s. 3; 1969, c. 1214, s. 3; 1971, c. 912, s. 3; 1973, c. 778, s. 3; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 18; 1977, c. 802, s. 42.14; 1983, c. 761, s. 209; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 164; 1987, c. 738, s. 32(b); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 114-8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 44, s. 89.

§ 114-8.1.
Attorney General interns.

The Attorney General may select interns to work in the Attorney General’s Office from institutions of higher education, including the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina. The Attorney General may adopt policies or rules to provide for the selection, tenure, duties, and compensation of these interns.

History.

1985, c. 479, s. 140.

§ 114-8.2.
Charges for legal services.

The Department of Justice shall charge State boards and commissions that are totally supported by receipts from fees or surcharges for legal services rendered by the Department to the board or commission. Client State departments, agencies, boards, and commissions shall reimburse the Department of Justice for reasonable court fees, attorney travel and subsistence costs, and other costs directly related to litigation in which the Department of Justice is representing the department, agency, or board.

History.

1989, c. 500, s. 60; 2011-145, s. 16.4.

§ 114-8.3.
Attorney General/General Counsel; review certain contracts.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (b1) of this section, the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee shall perform the duties required pursuant to G.S. 143-49(3a) for proposed contracts for contractual services that exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The designee shall confirm that the proposed contracts are (i) in proper legal form, (ii) contain all clauses required by North Carolina law, (iii) are legally enforceable, and (iv) accomplish the intended purposes of the proposed contract. The designee’s review does not constitute approval or disapproval of the policy merit or lack thereof of the proposed contract. For purposes of this subsection, the term “Attorney General’s designee” includes any attorney approved by the Attorney General to review contracts as provided in this subsection. The Attorney General shall:

Establish procedures regarding the review of contracts subject to this section and shall provide any attorney designated under G.S. 143-49(3a) with guidelines to be used in reviewing contracts.

Advise and assist the Contract Management Section of the Division of Purchase and Contract, Department of Administration, in establishing procedures and guidelines for the review of contracts pursuant to

G.S. 143-50.1

.

For the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, the General Counsel of each institution or the General Counsel’s designee shall review all proposed contracts for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) to ensure that the proposed contracts are (i) in proper legal form, (ii) contain all clauses required by North Carolina law, (iii) are legally enforceable, and (iv) accomplish the intended purposes of the proposed contract. The term “review” as used in this section does not constitute approval or disapproval of the policy merit or lack thereof of the proposed contract. For purposes of this subsection, the term “General Counsel’s designee” includes any attorney approved by the General Counsel to review contracts as provided in this subsection. The General Counsel shall establish procedures regarding the review of contracts subject to this section and shall require that any attorney designated under this subsection comply with any procedures established by the Attorney General or the Department of Administration regarding the review of contracts.

(b1)

The General Counsel of the Department of State Treasurer or the General Counsel’s designee shall review all proposed investment contracts, as defined in subdivision (4) of this subsection, and all proposed contracts for investment-related services entered pursuant to the State Treasurer’s authority under

G.S. 147-69.3

not constituting consulting contracts, to confirm that the proposed contracts (i) are in proper legal form, (ii) contain all clauses required by North Carolina law, (iii) are legally enforceable to the extent governed by North Carolina law, and (iv) accomplish the intended purposes of the proposed contract. The General Counsel shall establish, in consultation with the Attorney General and the Department of Administration, procedures regarding the review of contracts subject to this subsection. The following terms and requirements apply to contracts under this subsection:

The term “review” as used in this section does not constitute approval or disapproval of the policy merit or lack thereof of the proposed contract.

The term “General Counsel’s designee” includes any attorney employed or retained by the General Counsel to review contracts as provided in this subsection.

Any contract for services reviewed pursuant to this subsection must include the signature of the General Counsel or the General Counsel’s designee confirming that the Department of State Treasurer has adhered to the procedures established by the General Counsel regarding the review of the contract. Except for a contract entered into as part of direct trading of bonds, instruments, equity securities, or other approved securities, a contract that has not been signed as required by this subdivision is voidable by the State, and any party or parties to the contract are entitled to receive the value of services rendered prior to the termination of the contract.

For the purposes of this subsection, “investment contract” means any of the following:

Investments to be acquired, held, or sold, directly or indirectly, by or for the State Treasurer, the Department of State Treasurer, or an investment entity created by the Department of State Treasurer, either on its own behalf or on behalf of another beneficial owner.

Investments administered by the North Carolina Supplemental Retirement Board of Trustees.

All State agencies, the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, or any person who will be entering into a contract on behalf of the State for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, or contractual services that exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall notify the Secretary of the Department of Administration or the Secretary’s designee of the intent to enter into the contract and provide information as required by the Department for the purposes of maintaining a centralized log of contracts and identifying the location of the contract documents.

History.

2010-194, s. 16; 2011-326, s. 15(p); 2013-234, s. 1.

§ 114-8.4.
Legislative assistance to agencies and local governments.

The Department of Justice may (i) prepare bills to be presented to the General Assembly at the request of the Governor and the officials and departments of the State and advise in connection therewith and (ii) advise with and assist counties, cities, and towns in the drafting of legislation to be submitted to the General Assembly.

History.

2011-97, s. 2.

§ 114-8.5.
Itemized billing for legal services provided to State agencies.

Whenever the Department of Justice charges a State agency, board, or commission for legal services rendered by the Department, the Department shall do so by providing the agency, board, or commission with an invoice that includes at least all of the following information for all charges:

The case or matter for which the agency, board, or commission is being charged.

The name of each attorney who worked on each case or matter and the number of hours worked by each attorney.

The hourly rate being charged by each attorney.

History.

2012-142, s. 15.1.

§ 114-8.6.
Designation of State Crime Laboratory as Internet Crimes Against Children affiliated agency.

The Attorney General shall designate the North Carolina State Crime Laboratory as a North Carolina Internet Crimes Against Children (ICAC) affiliated agency.

History.

2013-360, s. 17.6(p).

§ 114-8.7.
Reports of animal cruelty and animal welfare violations.

The Attorney General shall establish a hotline to receive reports of allegations of animal cruelty or violations of the Animal Welfare Act, Article 3 of Chapter 19A of the General Statutes, against animals under private ownership, by means including telephone, electronic mail, and Internet Web site. The Attorney General shall periodically publicize the hotline telephone number, electronic mail address, Internet Web site address, and any other means by which the Attorney General may receive reports of allegations of animal cruelty or violations of the Animal Welfare Act. Any individual who makes a report under this section shall disclose his or her name and telephone number and any other information the Attorney General may require.

When the Attorney General receives allegations involving activity that the Attorney General determines may involve cruelty to animals under private ownership in violation of Article 47 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes, the allegations shall be referred to the appropriate local animal control authority for the unit or units of local government within which the violations are alleged to have occurred. When the Attorney General receives allegations involving activity that the Attorney General determines may involve violations of the Animal Welfare Act, the allegations shall be referred to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The Attorney General shall record the total number of reports received on the hotline and the number of reports received against any individual on the hotline.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the Department of Justice is authorized to spend any federal, State, local, or private funds available for this purpose to administer the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 147-33.72

C and related provisions of law, in order to expedite the timely implementation of technology systems to record and manage public allegations and complaints received pursuant to this section, the Department of Justice is exempted from external agency project approval standards.

History.

2015-286, s. 4.36(a).